Delaware, session 153, SB133.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF DELAWARE: Section 1. Amend Â§ 7907A, Title 29 of the Delaware Code by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows: Â§ 7907A. Distressed Cemetery Fund. (c) The Distressed Cemetery Fund must be audited annually by the State Auditorâs Office. The Office of Auditor of Accounts shall audit the Distressed Cemetery Fund at least once every 5 years.